Hawaii statutes.
[§371-15] Manpower planning administrator.
The position of manpower planning administrator which shall be exempt from
chapter 76 is established within the department of labor and industrial
relations. The manpower planning administrator shall be appointed by the
director with the concurrence of the state manpower services council. The
manpower planning administrator shall supervise and direct operations and
functions of the office of manpower planning within the department of labor and
industrial relations. The administrator shall also serve as executive director
of the state manpower services council as established under the Federal
Comprehensive Employment and Training Act of 1973, as amended. [L 1976, c 14,
§1; gen ch 1985; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next